Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,251
Equine activities; liability and claims; limitations.

Except as provided in section 25-21,252, (1) an equine activity sponsor, an equine professional, or any other person, which includes a corporation, limited liability company, or partnership, shall not be liable for an injury to or the death of a participant resulting from the inherent risks of equine activities and (2) no participant nor participant's representative shall make any claim against, maintain an action against, or recover from an equine activity sponsor, an equine professional, or any other person for injury, loss, damage, or death of the participant resulting from any of the inherent risks of equine activities.

Laws 1997, LB 153, § 3.